Utah statutes.
78B-3-105.   Definition of heir.

As used in Sections 78B-3-106 and 78B-3-107, "heirs" means:

(1)  the following surviving persons:

(a)  the decedent's spouse;

(b)  the decedent's children as provided in Section 75-2-114;

(c)  the decedent's natural parents, or if the decedent was adopted, then his adoptive parents;

(d)  the decedent's stepchildren who:

(i)  are in their minority at the time of decedent's death; and

(ii)  are primarily financially dependent on the decedent.

(2)  "Heirs" means any blood relative as provided by the law of intestate succession if the decedent is not survived by a person under Subsections (1)(a), (b), or (c).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

